Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 3
COOPERATIVE RETURN OF PAROLE
AND PROBATION VIOLATORS

17-2-301. Short title.

This part 3 shall be known and may be cited as the "Cooperative Return of Parole and Probation Violators Act of 1957".

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

17-2-302. Director - powers.

The executive director is authorized to deputize any person regularly employed by the state of Colorado, or any person regularly employed by another state, to act as an officer and agent of this state in effecting the return of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of parole or probation as granted by this state. In any matter relating to the return of such a person, any agent so deputized shall have all the powers of a police official of this state.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 843, § 31, effective May 24.

17-2-303. Deputization.

Any deputization pursuant to section 17-2-302 shall be in writing, and any person authorized to act as an agent of this state pursuant to this part 3 shall carry formal evidence of his deputization and shall produce the same upon demand.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

17-2-304. Interstate agreements.

The executive director is authorized to enter into contracts with similar officials of any other state, subject to approval of the governor, for the purpose of sharing an equitable portion of the cost of effecting the return of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of parole or probation as granted by this state.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 843, § 32, effective May 24.